Massachusetts, session 194th, S1938.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 6A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, 
2 is hereby amended by inserting after section 16FF the following section:- 
3  Section 16GG. (a) There shall be an advisory council on family caregiving. The advisory 
4 council shall consist of: the secretary of health and human services, or a designee; the secretary 
5 of aging and independence, or a designee; the commissioner of public health, or a designee; the 
6 secretary of veterans’ services, or a designee; the secretary of labor and workforce development, 
7 or a designee; the house and senate chairs of the joint committee on elder affairs, or their 
8 designees; and 10 persons to be appointed, in a manner that ensures, as much as possible, 
9 geographic and demographic diversity, by the governor, including 2 family caregiver advocates, 
10 2 family caregivers, 2 health care providers, 2 representatives of state-based academic 
11 institutions, 1 of whom is a gerontologist, and 2 representatives from state-based advocacy 

2 of 15 12 organizations that provide services to family caregivers, including information, referral and 
13 support services. 
14  (b) The advisory council shall meet at least quarterly and shall advise the executive office 
15 of health and human services and the general court on the development of family caregiving 
16 policy for the commonwealth. The advisory council shall work with the secretary of health and 
17 human services to identify resources available, and services needed for these individuals and 
18 associated costs. 
19  (c) Annually, not later than March 1, the advisory council shall provide a report to the 
20 executive office of health and human services, the clerks of the senate and the house of 
21 representatives, the joint committee on children, families, and persons with disabilities, the joint 
22 committee on elder affairs, and the joint committee on public health which shall include: (i) 
23 information and recommendations on family caregiving policy and (ii) an evaluation of all state-
24 funded efforts in caregiving research, clinical care, institutional and home-based and community-
25 based services and supports. 
26  SECTION 2. Chapter 19A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official 
27 Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 4D the following section:-              
28  Section 4E. (a) As used in this subsection, the following words shall have the following 
29 meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:  
30  "Activities of daily living", everyday functions and activities, which individuals usually 
31 do without help including, but not limited to, bathing, continence, dressing, eating, toileting and 
32 transferring. 

3 of 15 33  "Eligible family member", an individual who (i) is at least 18 years of age during a 
34 taxable year, (ii) requires assistance with at least 1 activity of daily living, and (iii) qualifies as a 
35 dependent, spouse, parent or other relation by blood or marriage, including an in-law, 
36 grandparent, grandchild, step-parent, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew of the family caregiver. 
37  "Family caregiver", an individual who is a resident for the year and had eligible 
38 caregiving actions, excluding those described in paragraph (d) of this subsection, with respect to 
39 1 or more eligible family members during the year.  
40  “Respite services”, a program that provides short term relief to family caregivers from the 
41 demands of caring for individuals with chronic or other health conditions, disabilities or 
42 functional limitations.  
43  (b) A family caregiver is eligible to receive a voucher for respite services up to 100 
44 percent of the eligible expenditures incurred by the family caregiver, with a maximum allowable 
45 voucher of $1,500, provided that the family caregiver has an annual income of no more than 
46 $135,000 for an individual or no more than $250,000 of combined household income  . One year 
47 following the enactment of this section, and annually thereafter, the executive office of aging and 
48 independence shall increase such income eligibility criteria over that of the previous fiscal year 
49 to reflect the annual cost of living adjustment in Social Security income, if any. 
50  (c)  Expenditures eligible to be claimed for the voucher include the costs associated with 
51 respite services. 
52  (d) No family caregiver shall be entitled to claim a respite voucher under this subsection 
53 for the same eligible expenditures claimed by another family caregiver.  

4 of 15 54  (e) The secretary of the executive office of aging and independence shall promulgate 
55 rules and regulations relative to the administration and enforcement of this subsection. 
56  (f) The secretary shall annually, not later than September 1, file a report with the house 
57 and senate committees on ways and means and the chairs of the joint committee on elder affairs 
58 identifying, by municipality, the total amount of caregiver respite vouchers claimed for the 
59 preceding fiscal year. 
60  SECTION 3. Section 6 of chapter 62 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
61 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (dd) the following new 
62 subsection:-    
63  (ee) (1) As used in this subsection, the following words shall have the following 
64 meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:        
65  "Activities of daily living", everyday functions and activities, which individuals usually 
66 do without help including, but not limited to, bathing, continence, dressing, eating, toileting and 
67 transferring. 
68  "Eligible family member", an individual who (i) is at least 18 years of age during a 
69 taxable year, (ii) requires assistance with at least 1 activity of daily living, and (iii) qualifies as a 
70 dependent, spouse, parent or other relation by blood or marriage, including an in-law, 
71 grandparent, grandchild, stepparent, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew of the family caregiver. 
72  “Evaluation year”, the year in which an evaluation of the tax credit is to be completed. 
73 The evaluation year shall be every 5 years after the effective date of this subsection. 

5 of 15 74  "Family Caregiver", an individual who is a resident taxpayer for the taxable year and had 
75 eligible expenditures, as described in paragraph (3) of this subsection, with respect to 1 or more 
76 eligible family members during the taxable year. In the case of a joint return, the term includes 
77 the individual and the individual's spouse. The family caregiver claiming the credit must have a 
78 Massachusetts adjusted gross income of less than $75,000 for an individual and $150,000 for a 
79 couple and incur uncompensated expenses directly related to the care of an eligible care 
80 recipient. 
81  (2) A taxpayer who is a family caregiver is eligible to receive for a taxable year is equal 
82 to a refundable credit against the taxes imposed by this chapter. The credit shall be equal to 100 
83 per cent of the eligible expenditures incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year, with a 
84 maximum allowable credit of $1,500. 
85  (3) Expenditures eligible to be claimed for the tax credit include the costs associated 
86 with: 
87  (i) the home improvement or alteration to the family caregiver's primary residence to 
88 permit the eligible family member to remain mobile, safe and independent; 
89  (ii) the purchase or lease of equipment that is necessary to assist an eligible family 
90 member in carrying out 1 or more activities of daily living; and 
91  (iii) other goods, services or supports that assist the family caregiver in providing care to 
92 an eligible family member, including expenditures related to hiring a home care aide or personal 
93 care attendant, respite care, adult day health, transportation, legal and financial services and 
94 assistive technology. 

6 of 15 95  (4) No taxpayer shall be entitled to claim a tax credit under this subsection for the same 
96 eligible expenditures claimed by another taxpayer. The total amount of tax credits claimed by 
97 family caregivers shall not exceed $1,500 for the same eligible family member. If 2 or more 
98 family caregivers claim tax credits for the same eligible family member, the total of which 
99 exceeds $1,500, the total amount of the credit allowed shall be allocated in amounts 
100 proportionate to each eligible taxpayer’s share of the total amount of the eligible expenditures for 
101 the eligible family member. 
102  (5) A taxpayer may not claim a tax credit under this section for expenses incurred in 
103 carrying out general household maintenance activities, including painting, plumbing, electrical 
104 repairs or exterior maintenance, and must be directly related to assisting the family caregiver in 
105 providing care to an eligible family member.  
106  (6) The commissioner of the department of revenue shall promulgate rules and 
107 regulations relative to the administration and enforcement of this subsection. 
108  (7) The commissioner shall annually, not later than September 1, file a report with the 
109 house and senate committees on ways and means, the chairs of the joint committee on revenue 
110 and the chairs of the joint committee on elder affairs identifying, by municipality, the total 
111 amount of tax credits claimed and the total number of tax filers who received the tax credit for 
112 the preceding fiscal year. 
113  (8) On or before May 31 of the year before the evaluation year, there shall be established 
114 a committee entitled the Caregiver Tax Credit Evaluation Committee to conduct a review of the 
115 tax credit. 

7 of 15 116  The committee shall be comprised of 7 members: 2 of whom shall be appointed by the 
117 secretary of the executive office of health and human services; 2 of whom shall be appointed by 
118 the secretary of the executive office of aging and independence; 1 of whom shall be appointed by 
119 the secretary of the executive office for administration and finance; 1 of whom shall be 
120 appointed by the president of the senate; and 1 of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the 
121 house of representatives. 
122  The committee shall: (i) examine the purpose for which the tax credit was established; (ii) 
123 determine whether the original intent of the tax credit is still appropriate; (iii) examine whether 
124 the tax credit is meeting its objectives; (iv) examine whether the purposes of the tax credit could 
125 be more efficiently and effectively carried out through alternative methods; and (v) calculate the 
126 costs of providing the tax credit, including the administrative cost and lost revenues to the 
127 commonwealth. 
128  The committee shall file a report of its findings with the senate and house clerks, the 
129 house and senate committees on ways and means and with the governor. The report shall be 
130 accompanied by any legislation that is needed to accomplish the recommendations of the report. 
131 The report shall be filed no later than December 31 of the evaluation year.              
132  SECTION 4. Section 1 of chapter 151A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
133 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (dd) the following 3 
134 subsections:-        
135  (ee) "Activities of daily living", everyday functions and activities, which individuals 
136 usually do without help including, but not limited to, bathing, continence, dressing, eating, 
137 toileting and transferring. 

8 of 15 138  (ff) “Eligible family member”, an individual who (i) is at least 18 years of age during a 
139 taxable year, (ii) requires assistance with at least 1 activity of daily living, and (iii) qualifies as a 
140 dependent, spouse, parent or other relation by blood or marriage, including an in-law, 
141 grandparent, grandchild, step-parent, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew of the family caregiver. 
142  (gg) “Family Caregiver”, an individual resident of Massachusetts who is at least 18 years 
143 of age and who provides assistance in the activities of daily living, with respect to 1 or more 
144 eligible family members during the year. 
145  SECTION 5. Subsection (c) of Section 24 of said chapter 151A of the General Laws, as 
146 appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence 
147 the following sentence:-  
148  An individual who can provide certified medical documentation showing that they act as 
149 a family caregiver, as defined in section 1 of this chapter, to an eligible family member requiring 
150 assistance with activities of daily living shall be deemed to be available for work under clause (b) 
151 of the first paragraph of this section. 
152  SECTION 6. Section 1 of chapter 151B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
153 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “genetic test” the 
154 following 3 definitions:-     
155  24. The term "activities of daily living", shall mean everyday functions and activities, 
156 which individuals usually do without help including, but not limited to, bathing, continence, 
157 dressing, eating, toileting and transferring. 

9 of 15 158  25. The term “eligible family member”, shall mean an individual who (i) is at least 18 
159 years of age during a taxable year, (ii) requires assistance with at least 1 activity of daily living, 
160 and (iii) qualifies as a dependent, spouse, parent or other relation by blood or marriage, including 
161 an in-law, grandparent, grandchild, step-parent, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew of the family 
162 caregiver. 
163  26. The term “family caregiver”, shall mean an individual resident of Massachusetts who 
164 is at least 18 years of age and who provides assistance in the activities of daily living, with 
165 respect to 1 or more eligible family members during the year. 
166  SECTION 7. Section 4 of said chapter 151B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
167 hereby amended by inserting after the word “veteran,” in line 8, line 190 and line 213, in each 
168 instance, the following words:- or status as a family caregiver 
169  SECTION 8. Said section 4 of said chapter 151B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
170 hereby further amended by inserting after the word “blind,” in line 296 and line 302, in each 
171 instance, the following words:- or because such person is as a family caregiver 
172  SECTION 9. Said section 4 of said chapter 151B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is 
173 hereby further amended by inserting after the word “handicap,” in line 315, the following 
174 words:- or because such person is as a family caregiver 
175  SECTION 10. Said section 4 of said chapter 151B of the General Laws, as so appearing, 
176 is hereby further amended by inserting the word “ancestry,” in line 361, line 369 and line 379, in 
177 each instance, the following:- or status as a family caregiver 

10 of 15 178  SECTION 11. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
179 section 17S the following section:- 
180  Section 17T. (1) The commission shall provide, to an active or retired employee of the 
181 commonwealth who is insured under the group insurance commission, an additional 30-day 
182 supply of any current prescription of the insured, at the same level of coverage as a normal refill 
183 of such prescription drug upon the declaration of a state of emergency pursuant to Chapter 639 of 
184 the Acts of 1950.  
185  (2) The commissioner of insurance shall promulgate a list of prescription drugs which 
186 shall not be subject to the provisions of this section. Such list shall include, but not be limited to, 
187 all schedule II and schedule III controlled substances with the exception of those prescribed 
188 through a hospice agency physician for purposes of treating end-of-life symptoms including 
189 pain, nausea, anxiety or delirium. 
190  SECTION 12. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
191 section 10Q the following section:- 
192  Section 10R. (1) The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health 
193 maintenance organizations, behavioral health management firms and third party administrators 
194 under contract to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall 
195 provide an additional 30-day supply of any current prescription of the insured, at the same level 
196 of coverage as a normal refill of such prescription drug upon the declaration of a state of 
197 emergency pursuant to Chapter 639 of the Acts of 1950.  
198  (2) The commissioner of insurance shall promulgate a list of prescription drugs which 
199 shall not be subject to the provisions of this section. Such list shall include, but not be limited to, 

11 of 15 200 all schedule II and schedule III controlled substances with the exception of those prescribed 
201 through a hospice agency physician for purposes of treating end-of-life symptoms including 
202 pain, nausea, anxiety or delirium. 
203  SECTION 13. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
204 section 8VV the following section:- 
205  Section 8WW. (1) A contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an 
206 individual or group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within or without 
207 the commonwealth shall provide an additional 30-day supply of any current prescription of the 
208 insured, at the same level of coverage as a normal refill of such prescription drug upon the 
209 declaration of a state of emergency pursuant to Chapter 639 of the Acts of 1950.  
210  (2) The commissioner of insurance shall promulgate a list of prescription drugs which 
211 shall not be subject to the provisions of this section. Such list shall include, but not be limited to, 
212 all schedule II and schedule III controlled substances with the exception of those prescribed 
213 through a hospice agency physician for purposes of treating end-of-life symptoms including 
214 pain, nausea, anxiety or delirium. 
215  SECTION 14. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
216 section 4VV the following section:- 
217  Section 4WW. (1) A subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service 
218 agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide an additional 
219 30-day supply of any current prescription of the insured, at the same level of coverage as a 
220 normal refill of such prescription drug upon the declaration of a state of emergency pursuant to 
221 Chapter 639 of the Acts of 1950.  

12 of 15 222  (2) The commissioner of insurance shall promulgate a list of prescription drugs which 
223 shall not be subject to the provisions of this section. Such list shall include, but not be limited to, 
224 all schedule II and schedule III controlled substances with the exception of those prescribed 
225 through a hospice agency physician for purposes of treating end-of-life symptoms including 
226 pain, nausea, anxiety or delirium.   
227  SECTION 15. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
228 section 4NN the following section:- 
229  Section 4OO. (1) Any health maintenance organization subject to this chapter that is 
230 issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide an additional 30-day supply of any 
231 current prescription of the insured, at the same level of coverage as a normal refill of such 
232 prescription drug upon the declaration of a state of emergency pursuant to Chapter 639 of the 
233 Acts of 1950.  
234  (2) The commissioner of insurance shall promulgate a list of prescription drugs which 
235 shall not be subject to the provisions of this section. Such list shall include, but not be limited to, 
236 all schedule II and schedule III controlled substances with the exception of those prescribed 
237 through a hospice agency physician for purposes of treating end-of-life symptoms including 
238 pain, nausea, anxiety or delirium. 
239  SECTION 16. Chapter 176I of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
240 section 3A the following section:-  
241  Section 3B. (1) A preferred provider contract between a covered person and an 
242 organization that participates in the market shall provide an additional 30-day supply of any 
243 current prescription of the insured, at the same level of coverage as a normal refill of such 

13 of 15 244 prescription drug upon the declaration of a state of emergency pursuant to Chapter 639 of the 
245 Acts of 1950.  
246  (2) The commissioner of insurance shall promulgate a list of prescription drugs which 
247 shall not be subject to the provisions of this section. Such list shall include, but not be limited to, 
248 all schedule II and schedule III controlled substances with the exception of those prescribed 
249 through a hospice agency physician for purposes of treating end-of-life symptoms including 
250 pain, nausea, anxiety or delirium.   
251  SECTION 17. Chapter 176J of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
252 section 14 the following section:-  
253  Section 14A. (1) Any carrier subject to this chapter that participates in the market shall 
254 provide an additional 30-day supply of any current prescription of the insured, at the same level 
255 of coverage as a normal refill of such prescription drug upon the declaration of a state of 
256 emergency pursuant to Chapter 639 of the Acts of 1950.  
257  (2) The commissioner of insurance shall promulgate a list of prescription drugs which 
258 shall not be subject to the provisions of this section. Such list shall include, but not be limited to, 
259 all schedule II and schedule III controlled substances with the exception of those prescribed 
260 through a hospice agency physician for purposes of treating end-of-life symptoms including 
261 pain, nausea, anxiety or delirium.  
262  SECTION 18. Chapter 176K of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
263 section 4 the following section:-  

14 of 15 264  Section 4A. (1) Any carrier subject to this chapter that participates in the market shall 
265 provide an additional 30-day supply of any current prescription of the insured, at the same level 
266 of coverage as a normal refill of such prescription drug upon the declaration of a state of 
267 emergency pursuant to Chapter 639 of the Acts of 1950.  
268  (2) The commissioner of insurance shall promulgate a list of prescription drugs which 
269 shall not be subject to the provisions of this section. Such list shall include, but not be limited to, 
270 all schedule II and schedule III controlled substances with the exception of those prescribed 
271 through a hospice agency physician for purposes of treating end-of-life symptoms including 
272 pain, nausea, anxiety or delirium.  
273  SECTION 19. Section 2 of chapter 176M of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
274 inserting after paragraph (1) of subsection (c) the following paragraph:-   
275  (1 1/2) Any nongroup health plan subject to this chapter that participates in the market 
276 shall provide an additional 30-day supply of any current prescription of the insured, at the same 
277 level of coverage as a normal refill of such prescription drug upon the declaration of a state of 
278 emergency pursuant to Chapter 639 of the Acts of 1950. The commissioner of insurance shall 
279 promulgate a list of prescription drugs which shall not be subject to the provisions of this 
280 paragraph. Such list shall include, but not be limited to, all schedule II and schedule III 
281 controlled substances with the exception of those prescribed through a hospice agency physician 
282 for purposes of treating end-of-life symptoms including pain, nausea, anxiety or delirium.   
283  SECTION 20. Chapter 176Q of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
284 section 5 the following section:-  

15 of 15 285  Section 5A. (1) Any plan that participates in the market shall provide an additional 30-
286 day supply of any current prescription of the insured, at the same level of coverage as a normal 
287 refill of such prescription drug upon the declaration of a state of emergency pursuant to Chapter 
288 639 of the Acts of 1950.  
289  (2) The commissioner of insurance shall promulgate a list of prescription drugs which 
290 shall not be subject to the provisions of this section. Such list shall include, but not be limited to, 
291 all schedule II and schedule III-controlled substances with the exception of those prescribed 
292 through a hospice agency physician for purposes of treating end-of-life symptoms including 
293 pain, nausea, anxiety or delirium. 
294  SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary 
295 of health and human services, in conjunction with the secretary of aging and independence, shall 
296 take action, including requesting federal approval, if required, to permit spouses to serve as paid 
297 caregivers in the MassHealth program. Any federal approvals that may be required to implement 
298 this section shall be filed no later than 6 months after the effective date of this act. 
299  SECTION 22: Section 3 of this act shall take effect upon its passage and apply to taxable 
300 years beginning on or after January 1 following the date of enactment.